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DTC P0136 Oxygen Sensor Circuit Malfunction (Bank 1
Sensor 2)

DTC P0156 Oxygen Sensor Circuit Malfunction (Bank 2
Sensor 2)

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
Refer to DTC P0031 on page DI−35.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

P0136
P0156

The following condition continues 5 minute or more.
S During driving with the engine warmed up, rear heated oxy-
gen sensor output does not change.

S Open or short in rear heated oxygen sensor circuit
S Rear heated oxygen sensor
S Rear heated oxygen sensor heater
S EFI or ECD relay

HINT:
S Bank 1 refers to bank that includes cylinder No. 1.
S Bank 2 refers to bank that does not includes cylinder No. 1.
S Sensor 2 refers to the sensor farther away from the engine assembly.

MONITOR DESCRIPTION
The ECM monitors the HO2S (sensor 2) by checking to make sure:
S The HO2S voltage does not remain Rich (above 0.5 volts) or Lean (below 0.4 volts) while the vehicle

is accelerating and decelerating for 4 to 8 minutes. If the voltage remains either Rich or Lean, the ECM
interprets this as a malfunction, illuminates the MIL and sets a DTC.

WIRING DIAGRAM
Refer to DTC P0031 on page DI−35.
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* Engine coolant temperature is greater than 75� C/167� F
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CONFIRMATION DRIVING PATTERN

(a) Connect the hand−held tester to the DLC3.
(b) Switch from normal mode to check mode (see page DI−3) .
(c)Warmup theengineuntil theenginecoolant temperature reaches to75 �C (167�F).
(d) Drive the vehicle at 60 km/h (38 mph) or more for 20 seconds or more.
(e)Allow theengine to idle for 10secondsormore.
(f)Performsteps (d) to (e)at least 12 times.
HINT:
If a malfunction exists, the check engine warning light is illuminated during step (f).
NOTICE:
If the conditions in this test are not strictly followed, detection of a malfunction will not occur. If you
do not have the Intelligent Tester II, turn the ignition switch OFF after performing steps from (c) to
(f), then perform steps from (c) to (f) again.

INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
Hand−held testeronly:
The narrowing down the trouble area is possible by performing ACTIVE TEST of the following ”A/F CON-
TROL” (Heated oxygen sensor or another can be distinguished).
(a)PerformACTIVETESTbyhand −held tester (A/FCONTROL).
HINT:
”A/FCONTROL” is theACTIVETESTwhichchanges the injectionvolumeto −12.5%or+25%.

(1)Connect thehand −held tester to theDLC3on thevehicle.
(2) Turn the ignition switch ON.
(3) Warm up the engine with the engine speed at 2,500 rpm for approximately 90 seconds.
(4) Select the item ”DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / ACTIVE TEST / A/F CONTROL”.
(5) Perform ”A/F CONTROL” with the engine in an idle condition (press the right or left button).

RESULT:
Heated oxygen sensor reacts in accordance with increase and decrease of injection volume
+25% � richoutput:More than0.5V
−12.5% � leanoutput:Lessthan0.4V

NOTICE:
However, there isa fewsecondsdelay in thesensor 1 (frontsensor)output.Andthere isamaximum
20 seconds delay in the sensor 2 (rear sensor).
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The following A/F CONTROL procedure enables the technician to check and graph the voltage output of
the heated oxygen sensors.
For displaying the graph indication, first enter ”ACTIVE TEST / A/F CONTROL / USER DATA,” then select
”02SB 1S1andO2SB 1S2”bypressing ”YES”button,andpush”ENTER”buttonbeforepressing ”F4”button.
HINT:
S Read freeze framedatausing thehand −held tester.Freeze framedata records theengineconditions

when a malfunction is detected. When troubleshooting, it is useful for determining whether the vehicle
was runningorstopped, theenginewaswarmedupornot, theair −fuel ratiowas leanor rich,etc.at
the time of the malfunction.
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1 Are there any other codes (besides DTC P0136 or P0156) being output?

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the hand−held tester to the DLC3.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON and push the hand−held tester main switch ON.
(c) When using hand−held tester, enter the following menus: DIAGNOSIS / OBD/MOBD / DTC INFO /

CURRENT CODES.
CHECK:
Read the DTC using the hand−held tester.
RESULT:

Display (DTC Output) Proceed to

P0136 or P0156 A

”P0136 or P0156” and other DTCs B

HINT:
If any other codes besides P0136 are output, perform the troubleshooting for those DTCs first.

B Go to relevant DTC chart (See page DI−1 9) .

A

2 Check output voltage of heated oxygen sensor.

PREPARATION:
(a)Connect thehand −held tester to theDLC3.
(b) Run the engine at 2,500 rpm for 3 minutes.
(c)Whenusinghand −held tester,enter the followingmenu:DIAGNOSIS /OBD/MOBD/DATALIST /ALL

/O2SB 1 S2orB2S2.
CHECK:
Read the voltage output of the heated oxygen sensor when the engine speed is suddenly increased.
HINT:
Quickly accelerate the engine to 4,000 rpm 3 minutes by using the accelerator pedal.
OK:

Heated oxygen sensor output voltage: Alternates from 0.4 V or less to 0.5 V or more.

OK Go to step 6.

NG
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3 Check resistance of heated oxygen sensor heater.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the H11, H12, H13 or H14 heated oxygen sensor
connector.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals of the heated oxygen
sensor.
OK:

Tester Connection Specified Condition

HT (H11−1) − +B (H11−2) 11.7 to 14.3 � (20˚C)

HT (H12−1) − +B (H12−2) 11.7 to 14.3 � (20˚C)

HT (H13−1) − +B (H13−2) 11.7 to 14.3 � (20˚C)

HT (H14−1) − +B (H14−2) 11.7 to 14.3 � (20˚C)

NG Replace heated oxygen sensor.

OK

4 Check EFI or ECD relay.

PREPARATION:
Remove the EFI or ECD relay from the engine room R/B.
CHECK:
Inspect the EFI or ECD relay.
OK:

Terminal No. Condition Specified Condition

Usually 10 k� or higher

1 − 3 Apply B+ between
terminals 2 and 4

Below 1 �

NG Replace EFI or ECD relay.

OK
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Reference (Bank 1 Sensor 1 System Drawing)

From
Battery EFI or ECD

No. 1 Fuse

EFI or ECD
Relay EFI or ECD

No. 2 Fuse

Heater Oxygen
Sensor

Heater

Sensor

HT1A

OX1A

E2

MREL

Engine Control ECU
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5 Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine control ECU
and heated oxygen sensor.

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the H12 or H14 heated oxygen sensor con-

nector.
(b) Disconnect the E8 engine control ECU connector.
CHECK:
Measure the resistance between the wire harness side connec-
tors.
OK:

Tester Connection Specified Condition

OX (H12−3) − OX1B (E8−29) Below 1 �

HT (H12−1) − HT1B (E8−5) Below 1 �

OX (H14−3) − OX2B (E8−21) Below 1 �

HT (H14−1) − HT2B (E8−25) Below 1 �

OX (H12−3) or OX1B (E8−29) −
Body ground

10 k� or higher

HT (H12−1) or HT1B (E8−5) −
Body ground

10 k� or higher

OX (H14−3) or OX2B (E8−21) −
Body ground

10 k� or higher

HT (H14−1) or HT2B (E8−25) −
Body ground

10 k� or higher

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Replace heated oxygen sensor.
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6 Perform confirmation driving pattern.

HINT:
Clear all DTCs prior to performing the confirmation driving pattern.

Go

7 Is the DTC P0136 or P0156 being output again?

NO Check for intermittent problems.

YES

Replace heated oxygen sensor.


